New Jersey, session 222, A4069.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         Receipts from the retail sale of any tangible personal property made from 100 percent post-recycled waste or recycled materials, including, but not limited to, recycled bricks, asphalt, and crushed concrete, are exempt from the tax imposed under the Sales and Use Tax Act, P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.). b.    As used in this section: Post-recycled waste means materials that have been salvaged or separated from general waste, and which have been processed for use as a raw material in the manufacturing of new products. Recycled materials means any item or commodity which is manufactured or produced in whole or in part from post-consumer waste material. 2. This act shall take effect immediately and apply to sales made on or after the first day of the second month next following the date of enactment.